Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
803

ARRESTS,
SEARCH WARRANTS

Part I. Arrests Generally

Section

803-1 Arrest; by warrant

803-2 By oral order

803-3 By person present

803-4 On suspicion

803-5 By police officer without warrant

803-6 Arrest, how made

803-7 Use of force

803-8 Weapons on person arrested

803-9 Examination after arrest; rights of
arrested person

803-10 Penalty

803-11 Entering house to arrest

Part IA. Arrest by Federal Officers

803-16 Officer of United States Customs and
Border

Protection Service or Citizenship and
Immigration

Services; arrest powers

803-17 United States marshal or deputy United
States marshal;

arrest powers

Part II. Fugitive Criminals on Vessels

803-21 Fugitive criminal; surrender by master of
vessel

803-22 Secreting prisoners on board; penalty

803-23 Searching vessels without warrant; penalty

803-24 War vessels excepted

Part III. Search Warrants

803-31 Search warrant; defined

803-32 Purposes

803-33 Affidavit

803-34 Contents

803-35 Deputies may serve

803-36 Notice to applicant

803-37 Power of officer serving

803-38 Munitions of war

Part IV. Electronic Eavesdropping

803-41 Definitions

803-42 Interception, access, and disclosure of
wire, oral, or

electronic communications, use of pen
register, trap

and trace device, and mobile tracking
device

prohibited

803-43 Devices to intercept wire, oral, or
electronic

communications and advertising of same
prohibited;

penalty; forfeiture

803-44 Application for court order to intercept
wire, oral,

or electronic communications

803-44.5 Application for a pen register or a trap
and trace

device

803-44.6 Issuance of an order for a pen register or
a trap and

trace device

803-44.7 Application for authorization to install
and use a

mobile tracking device

803-45 Authorization for disclosure and use of
intercepted

wire, oral, or electronic communications

803-46 Procedure for interception of wire, oral,
or

electronic communication

803-47 Reports concerning intercepted wire, oral,
or

electronic communications; reports
concerning pen

registers and trap and trace devices

803-47.5 Disclosure of contents of communication
while in

electronic storage

803-47.6 Requirements for governmental access

803-47.7 Backup preservation

803-47.8 Delay of notification

803-47.9 Cost reimbursement

803-48 Recovery of civil damages authorized

803-48.5 Injunction against illegal interception

803-49 Severability

803-50 Repealed

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next